Hawaii statutes.
§806-10 Form. The indictment may be
substantially in the following form:

In the Circuit Court of the ...............
Judicial Circuit, State of Hawaii ..............., Term 20.....

The State of Hawaii vs. .........................,
defendant.

The Grand Jury of the ............... Circuit
of the State of Hawaii do present that (here give name or description of the
accused). (Here set forth the offense and transaction according to the rules
in this chapter enunciated.)

A True Bill found this .......... day of
..........., 20.....

Signed:
..............................

Foreperson of the Grand Jury.

Signed:
..............................

(Official title of prosecuting officer.)

[L 1915, c 215, pt of §2; RL 1925, §4049; RL 1935,
§5508; RL 1945, §10810; RL 1955, §258-20; HRS §711-10; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1; gen ch 1993]

Revision Note

The date "19....." in the form was changed to
"20....." pursuant to §23G-16.

Rules of Court

Nature and contents of indictment, see HRPP rule 7(d).

Case Notes

Cited: 37 H. 625, 643 (1947), questioned 82 F. Supp. 65, 104
(1948).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next